New York, session 2025-2026, A6855.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act may be cited and shall be known as "Maddox's Law". 2 § 2. Subparagraph (xiii) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 1 of section 3 125.27 of the penal law, as added by chapter 300 of the laws of 2001, is 4 amended and a new subparagraph (xiv) is added to read as follows: 5 (xiii) the victim was killed in furtherance of an act of terrorism, as 6 defined in paragraph (b) of subdivision one of section 490.05 of this 7 chapter; [and] or 8 (xiv) the victim was a child under the age of twelve; and 9 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 10 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08966-01-5